California statutes. Labor Code
(a) No person shall be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing books, records, correspondence, documents, or other evidence in obedience to the subpoena of the board, on the ground that the testimony or evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture. However, no individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he is compelled, after having claimed his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, except that such individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

(b) No individual shall be granted immunity pursuant to subdivision (a) unless, at least 10 calendar days prior thereto, the board has given written notice, by registered mail, to the district attorney of each county who may have reasonable grounds for objecting to such grant of immunity. Such notice shall specify the subject matter of the inquiries to which the witness’ answers are to be immunized from use.

The board may not grant immunity in any case where it finds that a district attorney has reasonable grounds for objecting to such grant of immunity provided that the board may disregard objections that are not accompanied by the declaration of the district attorney that he or she is familiar with the notice and which sets forth the grounds for resisting such grant of immunity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1282.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.3.

Any party shall have the right to appear at any hearing in person, by counsel, or by other representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.4.

(a) Complaints, orders, and other process and papers of the board, its members, agents, or agency, may be served either personally or by registered mail or by telegraph, or by leaving a copy thereof at the principal office or place of business of the person required to be served. The verified return by the individual so serving the same setting forth the manner of such service shall be proof of the same, and the return post office receipt or telegraph receipt therefor when registered and mailed or telegraphed as provided in this subdivision shall be proof of service of the same. Witnesses summoned before the board, its members, agents, or agency, shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnesses in the courts of the state, and witnesses whose depositions are taken and the persons taking the same shall severally be entitled to the same fees as are paid for like services in the courts of the state.

(b) All process of any court to which application may be made under this part may be served in the county where the defendant or other person required to be served resides or may be found.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.5.

The several departments and agencies of the state upon request by the board, shall furnish the board all records, papers, and information in their possession, not otherwise privileged, relating to any matter before the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.6.

Any person who shall willfully resist, prevent, impede, or interfere with any member of the board or any of its agents or agencies in the performance of duties pursuant to this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand ($5,000) dollars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Rights of Agricultural Employees [1152. - 1152.]

1152.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection, and shall also have the right to refrain from any or all of such activities except to the extent that such right may be affected by an agreement requiring membership in a labor organization as a condition of continued employment as authorized in subdivision (c) of Section 1153.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Unfair Labor Practices and Regulation of Secondary Boycotts [1153. - 1155.7.]

1153.

It shall be an unfair labor practice for an agricultural employer to do any of the following:

(a) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce agricultural employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in Section 1152.

(b) To dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of any labor organization or contribute financial or other support to it. However, subject to such rules and regulations as may be made and published by the board pursuant to Section 1144, an agricultural employer shall not be prohibited from permitting agricultural employees to confer with him during working hours without loss of time or pay.

(c) By discrimination in regard to the hiring or tenure of employment, or any term or condition of employment, to encourage or discourage membership in any labor organization.

Nothing in this part, or in any other statute of this state, shall preclude an agricultural employer from making an agreement with a labor organization (not established, maintained, or assisted by any action defined in this section as an unfair labor practice) to require as a condition of employment, membership therein on or after the fifth day following the beginning of such employment, or the effective date of such agreement whichever is later, if such labor organization is the representative of the agricultural employees as provided in Section 1156 in the appropriate collective-bargaining unit covered by such agreement. No employee who has been required to pay dues to a labor organization by virtue of his employment as an agricultural worker during any calendar month, shall be required to pay dues to another labor organization by virtue of similar employment during such month. For purposes of this chapter, membership shall mean the satisfaction of all reasonable terms and conditions uniformly applicable to other members in good standing; provided, that such membership shall not be denied or terminated except in compliance with a constitution or bylaws which afford full and fair rights to speech, assembly, and equal voting and membership privileges for all members, and which contain adequate procedures to assure due process to members and applicants for membership.

(d) To discharge or otherwise discriminate against an agricultural employee because he has filed charges or given testimony under this part.

(e) To refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with labor organizations certified pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1156) of this part.

(f) To recognize, bargain with, or sign a collective-bargaining agreement with any labor organization not certified pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.

It shall be an unfair labor practice for a labor organization or its agents to do any of the following:

(a) To restrain or coerce:

(1) Agricultural employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in Section 1152. This paragraph shall not impair the right of a labor organization to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition or retention of membership therein.

(2) An agricultural employer in the selection of his representatives for the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances.

(b) To cause or attempt to cause an agricultural employer to discriminate against an employee in violation of subdivision (c) of Section 1153, or to discriminate against an employee with respect to whom membership in such organization has been denied or terminated for reasons other than failure to satisfy the membership requirements specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1153.

(c) To refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with an agricultural employer, provided it is the representative of his employees subject to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1156) of this part.

(d) To do either of the following: (i) To engage in, or to induce or encourage any individual employed by any person to engage in, a strike or a refusal in the course of his employment to use, manufacture, process, transport, or otherwise handle or work on any goods, articles, materials, or commodities, or to perform any services; or (ii) to threaten, coerce, or restrain any person; where in either case (i) or (ii) an object thereof is any of the following:

(1) Forcing or requiring any employer or self-employed person to join any labor or employer organization or to enter into any agreement which is prohibited by Section 1154.5.

(2) Forcing or requiring any person to cease using, selling, transporting, or otherwise dealing in the products of any other producer, processor, or manufacturer, or to cease doing business with any other person, or forcing or requiring any other employer to recognize or bargain with a labor organization as the representative of his employees unless such labor organization has been certified as the representative of such employees. Nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed to make unlawful, where not otherwise unlawful, any primary strike or primary picketing.

(3) Forcing or requiring any employer to recognize or bargain with a particular labor organization as the representative of his agricultural employees if another labor organization has been certified as the representative of such employees under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1156) of this part.

(4) Forcing or requiring any employer to assign particular work to employees in a particular labor organization or in a particular trade, craft, or class, unless such employer is failing to conform to an order or certification of the board determining the bargaining representative for employees performing such work. 

Nothing contained in this subdivision (d) shall be construed to prohibit publicity, including picketing for the purpose of truthfully advising the public, including consumers, that a product or products or ingredients thereof are produced by an agricultural employer with whom the labor organization has a primary dispute and are distributed by another employer, as long as such publicity does not have an effect of inducing any individual employed by any person other than the primary employer in the course of his employment to refuse to pick up, deliver, or transport any goods, or not to perform any services at the establishment of the employer engaged in such distribution, and as long as such publicity does not have the effect of requesting the public to cease patronizing such other employer.

However, publicity which includes picketing and has the effect of requesting the public to cease patronizing such other employer, shall be permitted only if the labor organization is currently certified as the representative of the primary employer’s employees.

Further, publicity other than picketing, but including peaceful distribution of literature which has the effect of requesting the public to cease patronizing such other employer, shall be permitted only if the labor organization has not lost an election for the primary employer’s employees within the preceding 12-month period, and no other labor organization is currently certified as the representative of the primary employer’s employees.

Nothing contained in this subdivision (d) shall be construed to prohibit publicity, including picketing, which may not be prohibited under the United States Constitution or the California Constitution.

Nor shall anything in this subdivision (d) be construed to apply or be applicable to any labor organization in its representation of workers who are not agricultural employees. Any such labor organization shall continue to be governed in its intrastate activities for nonagricultural workers by Section 923 and applicable judicial precedents.

(e) To require of employees covered by an agreement authorized under subdivision (c) of Section 1153 the payment, as a condition precedent to becoming a member of such organization, of a fee in an amount which the board finds excessive or discriminatory under all circumstances. In making such a finding, the board shall consider, among other relevant factors, the practices and customs of labor organizations in the agriculture industry and the wages currently paid to the employees affected.

(f) To cause or attempt to cause an agricultural employer to pay or deliver, or agree to pay or deliver, any money or other thing of value, in the nature of an exaction, for services which are not performed or not to be performed.

(g) To picket or cause to be picketed, or threaten to picket or cause to be picketed, any employer where an object thereof is either forcing or requiring an employer to recognize or bargain with a labor organization as the representative of his employees, or forcing or requiring the employees of an employer to accept or select such labor organization as their collective-bargaining representative, unless such labor organization is currently certified as the representative of such employees, in any of the following cases:

(1) Where the employer has lawfully recognized in accordance with this part any other labor organization and a question concerning representation may not appropriately be raised under Section 1156.3.

(2) Where within the preceding 12 months a valid election under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1156) of this part has been conducted.

Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit any picketing or other publicity for the purpose of truthfully advising the public (including consumers) that an employer does not employ members of, or have a contract with, a labor organization, unless an effect of such picketing is to induce any individual employed by any other person in the course of his employment, not to pick up, deliver, or transport any goods or not to perform any services.

Nothing in this subdivision (g) shall be construed to permit any act which would otherwise be an unfair labor practice under this section.

(h) To picket or cause to be picketed, or threaten to picket or cause to be picketed, any employer where an object thereof is either forcing or requiring an employer to recognize or bargain with the labor organization as a representative of his employees unless such labor organization is currently certified as the collective-bargaining representative of such employees.

(i) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to make unlawful a refusal by any person to enter upon the premises of any agricultural employer, other than his own employer, if the employees of such employer are engaged in a strike ratified or approved by a representative of such employees whom such employer is required to recognize under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.5.

It shall be an unfair labor practice for any labor organization which represents the employees of the employer and such employer to enter into any contract or agreement, express or implied, whereby such employer ceases or refrains, or agrees to cease or refrain, from handling, using, selling, transporting, or otherwise dealing in any of the products of any other employer, or to cease doing business with any other person, and any contract or agreement entered into heretofore or hereafter containing such an agreement shall be, to such extent, unenforceable and void. Nothing in this section shall apply to an agreement between a labor organization and an employer relating to a supplier of an ingredient or ingredients which are integrated into a product produced or distributed by such employer where the labor organization is certified as the representative of the employees of such supplier, but no collective-bargaining agreement between such supplier and such labor organization is in effect. Further, nothing in this section shall apply to an agreement between a labor organization and an agricultural employer relating to the contracting or subcontracting of work to be done at the site of the farm and related operations. Nothing in this part shall prohibit the enforcement of any agreement which is within the foregoing exceptions.

Nor shall anything in this section be construed to apply or be applicable to any labor organization in its representation of workers who are not agricultural employees. Any such labor organization shall continue to be governed in its intrastate activities for nonagricultural workers by Section 923 and applicable judicial precedents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.6.

It shall be an unfair labor practice for an employer or labor organization, or their agents, willfully to arrange for persons to become employees for the primary purpose of voting in elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.

The expressing of any views, arguments, or opinions, or the dissemination thereof, whether in written, printed, graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute evidence of an unfair labor practice under the provisions of this part, if such expression contains no threat of reprisal or force, or promise of benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.2.

(a) For purposes of this part, to bargain collectively in good faith is the performance of the mutual obligation of the agricultural employer and the representative of the agricultural employees to meet at reasonable times and confer in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment, or the negotiation of an agreement, or any questions arising thereunder, and the execution of a written contract incorporating any agreement reached if requested by either party, but such obligation does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or require the making of a concession.

(b) Upon the filing by any person of a petition not earlier than the 90th day nor later than the 60th day preceding the expiration of the 12-month period following initial certification, the board shall determine whether an employer has bargained in good faith with the currently certified labor organization. If the board finds that the employer has not bargained in good faith, it may extend the certification for up to one additional year, effective immediately upon the expiration of the previous 12-month period following initial certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.3.

(a) Where there is in effect a collective-bargaining contract covering agricultural employees, the duty to bargain collectively shall also mean that no party to such contract shall terminate or modify such contract, unless the party desiring such termination or modification does all of the following:

(1) Serves a written notice upon the other party to the contract of the proposed termination or modification not less than 60 days prior to the expiration date thereof, or, in the event such contract contains no expiration date, 60 days prior to the time it is proposed to make such termination or modification.

(2) Offers to meet and confer with the other party for the purpose of negotiating a new contract or a contract containing the proposed modifications.

(3) Notifies the Conciliation Service of the State of California within 30 days after such notice of the existence of a dispute, provided no agreement has been reached by that time.

(4) Continues in full force and effect, without resorting to strike or lockout, all the terms and conditions of the existing contract, for a period of 60 days after such notice is given, or until the expiration date of such contract, whichever occurs later.

(b) The duties imposed upon agricultural employers and labor organizations by paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a) shall become inapplicable upon an intervening certification of the board that the labor organization or individual which is a party to the contract has been superseded as, or has ceased to be the representative of the employees, subject to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1156) of this part, and the duties so imposed shall not be construed to require either party to discuss or agree to any modification of the terms and conditions contained in a contract for a fixed period, if such modification is to become effective before such terms and conditions can be reopened under the provisions of the contract. Any agricultural employee who engages in a strike within the 60-day period specified in this section shall lose his status as an agricultural employee of the agricultural employer engaged in the particular labor dispute, for the purposes of Section 1153 to 1154 inclusive, and Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 1156) and 6 (commencing with Section 1160) of this part, but such loss of status for such employee shall terminate if and when he is reemployed by such employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.4.

It shall be unlawful for any agricultural employer or association of agricultural employers, or any person who acts as a labor relations expert, adviser, or consultant to an agricultural employer, or who acts in the interest of an agricultural employer, to pay, lend, or deliver, any money or other thing of value to any of the following:

(a) Any representative of any of his agricultural employees.

(b) Any agricultural labor organization, or any officer or employee thereof, which represents, seeks to represent, or would admit to membership, any of the agricultural employees of such employer.

(c) Any employee or group or committee of employees of such employer in excess of their normal compensation for the purpose of causing such employee or group or committee directly or indirectly to influence any other employees in the exercise of the right to organize and bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing.

(d) Any officer or employee of an agricultural labor organization with intent to influence him in respect to any of his actions, decisions, or duties as a representative of agricultural employees or as such officer or employee of such labor organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.5.

It shall be unlawful for any person to request, demand, receive, or accept, or agree to receive or accept, any payment, loan, or delivery of any money or other thing of value prohibited by Section 1155.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.6.

Nothing in Section 1155.4 or 1155.5 shall apply to any matter set forth in subsection (c) of Section 186 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.7.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply or be applicable to any labor organization in its representation of workers who are not agricultural employees. Any such labor organization shall continue to be governed in its intrastate activities for nonagricultural workers by Section 923 and applicable judicial precedents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Labor Representatives and Elections [1156. - 1159.]

1156.

(a) Representatives designated by the submission of authorization cards or other proof of support or selected by a secret ballot by the majority of the agricultural employees in the bargaining unit shall be the exclusive representatives of all the agricultural employees in such unit for the purpose of collective bargaining with respect to rates of pay, wages, hours of employment, or other conditions of employment. Any individual agricultural employee or a group of agricultural employees shall have the right at any time to present grievances to their agricultural employer and to have such grievances adjusted, without the intervention of the bargaining representative, as long as the adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of a collective-bargaining contract or agreement then in effect, if the bargaining representative has been given opportunity to be present at such adjustment.

(b) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 4.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 5 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.

(a) Representatives designated or selected by a secret ballot for the purposes of collective bargaining by the majority of the agricultural employees in the bargaining unit shall be the exclusive representatives of all the agricultural employees in such unit for the purpose of collective bargaining with respect to rates of pay, wages, hours of employment, or other conditions of employment. Any individual agricultural employee or a group of agricultural employees shall have the right at any time to present grievances to their agricultural employer and to have such grievances adjusted, without the intervention of the bargaining representative, as long as the adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of a collective-bargaining contract or agreement then in effect, if the bargaining representative has been
 given.

(b) This section shall be operative January 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 5.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.2.

The bargaining unit shall be all the agricultural employees of an employer. If the agricultural employees of the employer are employed in two or more noncontiguous geographical areas, the board shall determine the appropriate unit or units of agricultural employees in which a secret ballot election shall be conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.3.

(a) A petition that is either signed by, or accompanied by authorization cards signed by, a majority of the currently employed employees in the bargaining unit may be filed by an agricultural employee or group of agricultural employees, or any individual or labor organization acting on behalf of those agricultural employees, in accordance with any rules and regulations prescribed by the board. The petition shall allege all of the following:

(1) That the number of agricultural employees currently employed by the employer named in the petition, as determined from the employer’s payroll immediately preceding the filing of the petition, is not less than 50 percent of the employer’s peak agricultural employment for the current calendar year.

(2) That no valid election pursuant to this section has been conducted among the agricultural employees of the employer named in the petition within the 12 months immediately preceding the filing of the petition.

(3) That no labor organization is currently certified as the exclusive collective bargaining representative of the agricultural employees of the employer named in the petition.

(4) That the petition is not barred by an existing collective bargaining agreement.

(b) Upon receipt of a signed petition, as described in subdivision (a), the board shall immediately investigate the petition. If the board has reasonable cause to believe that a bona fide question of representation exists, it shall direct a representation election by secret ballot to be
 held, upon due notice to all interested parties and within a maximum of seven days of the filing of the petition. If, at the time the election petition is filed, a majority of the employees in a bargaining unit are engaged in a strike, the board shall, with all due diligence, attempt to hold a secret ballot election within 48 hours of the filing of the petition. The holding of elections under strike circumstances shall take precedence over the holding of other secret ballot elections.

(c) The board shall make available at any election held under this chapter ballots printed in English and Spanish. The board may also make available at the election ballots printed in any other language as may be requested by an agricultural labor organization or any agricultural employee eligible to vote under this part. Every election ballot, except ballots in runoff elections where the choice is between labor organizations, shall provide the employee with the
 opportunity to vote against representation by a labor organization by providing an appropriate space designated “No Labor Organizations.”

(d) Any other labor organization shall be qualified to appear on the ballot if it presents authorization cards signed by at least 20 percent of the employees in the bargaining unit at least 24 hours prior to the election.

(e) (1) Within five days after an election, any person may file with the board a signed petition asserting that allegations made in the petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a) were incorrect, asserting that the board improperly determined the geographical scope of the bargaining unit, or objecting to the conduct of the election or conduct affecting the results of the election.

(2) Upon receipt of a petition under this subdivision, the
 board, upon due notice, shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the election shall be certified. This hearing may be conducted by an officer or employee of a regional office of the board. The officer may not make any recommendations with respect to the certification of the election. The board may refuse to certify the election if it finds, on the record of the hearing, that any of the assertions made in the petition filed pursuant to this subdivision are correct, that the election was not conducted properly, or that misconduct affecting the results of the election occurred. The board shall certify the election unless it determines that there are sufficient grounds to refuse to do so.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the board refuses to certify an election because of employer misconduct that, in addition to affecting the results of the election, would render slight the chances of a new election reflecting the free and
 fair choice of employees, the labor organization shall be certified as the exclusive bargaining representative for the bargaining unit.

(g) If no petition is filed pursuant to subdivision (e) within five days of the election, the board shall certify the election.

(h) The board shall decertify a labor organization if either of the following occur:

(1) The Civil Rights Department finds that the labor organization engaged in discrimination on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the
 Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(2) The United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission finds, pursuant to Section 2000e-5 of Title 42 of the United States Code, that the labor organization engaged in discrimination on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, sex, or any other arbitrary or invidious classification in violation of Subchapter VI of Chapter 21 of Title 42 of the United States Code during the period of the labor organization’s present certification.

(i) (1) With regard to elections held pursuant to this section or Section 1156.7, the following time limits apply for action by the board, and agents acting pursuant to authority delegated by the board:

(A) (i) The board shall, within 21 days
 of the filing of election objections or the submittal of evidence in support of challenges to ballots, evaluate the election objections or challenged ballots and issue a decision determining which, if any, must be set for hearing.

(ii) The hearing on election objections or challenged ballots set pursuant to clause (i) shall be scheduled to commence within 28 days of the date of the board’s decision to set a hearing.

(B) The investigative hearing examiner (IHE) appointed pursuant to Section 1145 shall issue a recommended decision within 60 days of the close of the hearing on the matters described in subparagraph (A). Upon mutual agreement of the parties, the IHE may extend the time period to issue a recommended decision by 30 days.

(C) The board shall issue a decision regarding the election objections or challenged
 ballots within 45 days of receipt of any exceptions to the decision of the IHE.

(2) The board may consolidate a challenged ballot hearing with a hearing on objections to an election.

(3) The board may grant extensions on the time limits specified in this subdivision upon a showing of good cause or by stipulation of all affected parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 59.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1156.37.

(a) A labor organization may become the exclusive representative for the agricultural employees of an appropriate bargaining unit for purposes of collective bargaining with respect to rates of pay, wages, hours of employment, or other conditions of employment by filing a Majority Support Petition with the board alleging that a majority of the employees in the bargaining unit wish to be represented by that organization. The petition shall describe the geographical area that constitutes the unit claimed to be appropriate and shall be accompanied by proof of majority support, through authorization cards, petitions, or other appropriate proof of majority support. Only labor organizations that have filed LM-2 forms for the preceding two years with the federal government and have a collective bargaining
 agreement covering agricultural employees as defined in Section 1140.4 as of the effective date of this section may file a Majority Support Petition.

(b) A labor organization that wishes to represent a particular bargaining unit, as described in Section 1156.2, may be certified as that unit’s bargaining representative by submitting to the board a Majority Support Petition. The petition shall allege all of the following:

(1) That the number of agricultural employees currently employed by the employer named in the Majority Support Petition, as determined from the employer’s payroll immediately preceding the filing of the Majority Support Petition, is not less than 50 percent of the employer’s peak agricultural employment for the current calendar year.

(2) That no valid election has been conducted among the agricultural
 employees of the employer named in the Majority Support Petition within the 12 months immediately preceding the filing of the petition.

(3) That the Majority Support Petition is not barred by an existing collective bargaining agreement.

(c) The Majority Support Petition described in subdivision (b) shall be supported by a proof of majority support, through authorization cards, petitions, or other appropriate proof of majority support of the currently employed employees, as determined from the employer’s payroll immediately preceding the filing of the Majority Support Petition. The showing of support shall be submitted together with the Majority Support Petition.

(d) A labor organization submitting a Majority Support Petition shall personally serve the petition on the employer on the same day that the petition is
 filed with the board. Within 48 hours after the petition is served, the employer shall file with the board, and personally serve upon the labor organization that filed the petition, its response to the petition. As part of the response, the employer shall provide a complete and accurate list of the full names, current street addresses, telephone numbers, job classifications, and crew or department of all currently employed employees in the bargaining unit employed as of the payroll period immediately preceding the filing of the petition. The employer shall organize the employees’ names and addresses and other information by crew or department and shall provide the list to the board and petitioning labor organization in hardcopy and electronic format. The employee’s first name, middle name or initial, last name, address, city, state, ZIP Code, telephone number, classification, and crew or department shall be organized into separate columns. Immediately upon receiving the employer response and employee list,
 the board shall provide the response and employee list by hardcopy and electronic copy to the labor organization that filed the Majority Support Petition.

(e) (1) Upon receipt of a Majority Support Petition, the board shall immediately commence an investigation regarding the validity of the petition and the proof of support submitted. Within five days of receipt of the petition, the board shall make an administrative determination as to whether the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) are met by the petition and whether the labor organization submitting the petition has provided proof of majority support. In making this determination, the board shall compare the names on the proof of support submitted by the labor organization to the names on the list of currently employed employees provided by the employer. The board shall ignore discrepancies between the employee’s name listed on the proof of support and the
 employee’s name on the employer’s list if the preponderance of the evidence, such as the employee’s address, the name of the employee’s foreman or forewoman, or evidence submitted by the labor organization or employee shows that the employee who signed the proof of support is the same person as the employee on the employer’s list.

(2) The board shall return proof of majority support that it finds invalid to the labor organization that filed the Majority Support Petition, with an explanation as to why each proof of support was found to be invalid. To protect the confidentiality of the employees whose names are on authorization cards or a petition, the board’s determination of whether a particular proof of support is valid shall be final and not subject to appeal or review.

(3) If the board determines that the labor organization has submitted proof of majority support and met the
 requirements set forth in this section, it shall immediately certify the labor organization as the exclusive bargaining representative of the employees in the bargaining unit. An employer’s duty to bargain with the labor organization commences immediately after the labor organization is certified.

(4) If the board determines that the labor organization has not submitted the requisite proof of majority support, the board shall notify the labor organization of the deficiency and grant the labor organization 30 days from the date it is notified to submit additional support.
